Alabama, session 2026rs, SB374.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. The following amendment to the Constitution
of Alabama of 2022, is proposed:
PROPOSED AMENDMENT
(a) In addition to all other ad valorem taxes,
beginning with the tax year for which taxes become due and
payable on October 1, 2027, and continuing through September
30, 2034, there is levied an ad valorem tax on all taxable
property located in Henry County and south of Sandy Creek at a
rate of three mills per dollar of assessed value.
(b) The proceeds of the tax shall be used exclusively
for public school purposes for projects in Headland.
Upon ratification of this constitutional amendment, the
Code Commissioner shall number and place this amendment as
appropriate in the constitution omitting this instructional
paragraph and may make the following nonsubstantive revisions:
change capitalization, hierarchy, spelling, and punctuation
for purposes of style and uniformity; correct manifest
grammatical, clerical, and typographical errors; revise
internal or external citations and cross-references; harmonize
language; and translate effective dates.
END PROPOSED AMENDMENT
Page 1

END PROPOSED AMENDMENT
SB374 Enrolled
Section 2. An election upon the proposed amendment
shall be held in accordance with Sections 284, 284.01, and 285
of the Constitution of Alabama of 2022, and the election laws
of this state. The appropriate election official shall assign
a ballot number for the proposed constitutional amendment on
the election ballot and shall set forth the following
description of the substance or subject matter of the proposed
constitutional amendment:
"Relating to Henry County, proposing an amendment to
the Constitution of Alabama of 2022, to levy a temporary ad
valorem tax of three mills on taxable property located south
of Sandy Creek to support public school projects in Headland.
Proposed by Act ____."
This description shall be followed by the following
language:
"Yes( ) No( )."
Section 3. The proposed amendment shall become valid as
part of the Constitution of Alabama of 2022, when approved by
a majority of the qualified electors voting thereon.
Page 2

a majority of the qualified electors voting thereon.
SB374 Enrolled






________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate



________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives


SB374
Senate 01-Apr-26
I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and passed
the Senate.

Patrick Harris,
Secretary.




House of Representatives
Passed: 07-Apr-26




By: Senator Beasley
Page 3